Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.   Nonlapsing accounts and funds.

(1)  The revenue collections, appropriations from a fund or account, and appropriations to a program that are listed in Sections 63J-1-602.1 through 63J-1-602.5 are nonlapsing.

(2)  No revenue collection, appropriation from a fund or account, or appropriation to a program may be treated as nonlapsing unless:

(a)  it is listed in Sections 63J-1-602.1 through 63J-1-602.5;

(b)  it is designated in a condition of appropriation in the appropriations bill; or

(c)  nonlapsing authority is granted under Section 63J-1-603.

(3)  Each legislative appropriations subcommittee shall review the accounts and funds that have been granted nonlapsing authority under the provisions of this section or Section 63J-1-603.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 10, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 218, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 265, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 265, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 277, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 278, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 287, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 391, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 399, 2010 General Session

